Utah statutes.
65A-1-12.   Filing date of applications and bids.
Any application or bid required for the lease, permitting, or sale of state
lands in a competitive process shall be considered filed or made on the date
received by the appropriate division office, whether transmitted by the United
States mail or in any other manner.
